Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
CERTIFICATION SERVICES REVOLVING FUND

Note

Part heading amended by L 2003, c 49, pt of §8.

§147-101 Certification services revolving
fund. There is established a certification services revolving fund for use
by the department of agriculture to support certification or audit services
established under parts I, III, IV, VIII, and IX. Moneys in the fund may be
expended for materials, salaries, equipment, training, travel, and other costs
related to providing certification or audit services. Notwithstanding sections
147-10, 147-34, 147-64, 147-114 and 147-126, moneys derived from the
certification or audit services provided by temporary inspectors employed under
this part or from charges for traveling expenses or extraordinary services shall
be deposited into the fund. [L 1994, c 264, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L
2003, c 49, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next